Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-109
Property not in possession of conveyor; conveyance effective.

Any act which would be effective as a conveyance inter vivos or as a mortgage or as a testamentary disposition of property when the land or thing other than land is in the possession of the conveyor, is effective as a conveyance of the conveyor's interest therein, when the land or thing other than land is out of the conveyor's possession whether adversely held or not.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 9, p. 596;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1009;

R.S.1943, § 76-109.